North Carolina, session 2025, HB260.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Subsection 4.2(g) of S.L. 2024-1 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 4.2.(g) Of the funds allocated to the City of Raeford by Section 12.2(e)(145) of
S.L. 2023-134, three million dollars ($3,000,000) shall be used for the extension of sewer lines
to the Cameron Heights community.community or for any other water or wastewater project."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H260-v-1*